Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.4893

Part-time academic employees—Sick leave.

(1) Part-time academic employees of community and technical colleges shall receive sick leave to be used for the same illnesses, injuries, bereavement, and emergencies as full-time academic employees at the college in proportion to the individual's teaching commitment at the college.

(2) The provisions of RCW 41.04.665 shall apply to leave sharing for part-time academic employees who accrue sick leave under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The provisions of RCW 28B.50.553 shall apply to remuneration for unused sick leave for part-time academic employees who accrue sick leave under subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2000 c 128 s 1.]

NOTES:

Construction—2000 c 128: See note following RCW 28B.52.220.